Louisiana, session 2026, HB1062.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:1945.1(B), (D)(2) through (4), and (E)(3) and (5)(introductory
paragraph) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1945.1. Board of directors of the Special School District; creation; membership;
terms; powers, duties, and functions
* * *
B. Of the members appointed by the governor, there shall be at least one
resident of each public health region established by the office of public health of the
Louisiana Department of Health, with no more than two members from any region.
Each official or organization required to submit a list of nominees pursuant to
Subsection A of this Section shall submit the list of nominees to the office of the
governor by August first each year.
* * *
D. The board shall have the authority to do the following:
* * *
(2) Purchase land and equipment and make improvements to facilities
necessary for the use of the district in accordance with applicable law.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1062 ENROLLED
(3) Lease land or other property belonging to the district, subject to approval
of the commissioner of administration and in accordance with applicable law.
(4) Sell or exchange land or other immovable property not needed for district
purposes, but only when specifically authorized by law and then in accordance only
with the procedures provided in R.S. 41:892 for the sale of unused school lands. The
sale shall be authorized by resolution adopted by the board, and the act of sale shall
be signed by the president of the board or such other person to whom the signing
may be delegated by the board in the authorizing resolution.
(5) (2) Adopt rules, regulations, and policies necessary or proper for the
conduct of the business of the board.
(6) Award certificates and issue diplomas for successful completion of
programs of study. All such certificates and diplomas shall be in addition to a
regular high school diploma which shall be issued by the State Board of Elementary
and Secondary Education in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 17:6(A)(11) to
any student who successfully completes the program of study adopted by the state
board.
(7) Enter into (3) Approve contracts and agreements which have been
recommended by the district superintendent, in accordance with applicable law, and
to the extent that funds are specifically appropriated therefor, with other public
agencies with respect to cooperative enterprises and undertakings related to or
associated with an educational purpose or program affecting education in the district.
This shall not preclude the board from entering into other such contracts and
agreements that it deems necessary to carry out its duties and functions. The board
may enter into a contract for the purpose of recruiting to hire a new district
superintendent pursuant to the Louisiana Procurement Code, R.S. 39:1551 et seq.
(8) (4) Perform such other functions as are necessary for the governance of
the district.
E. In addition to the authorities granted by this Section and any powers,
duties, and responsibilities vested by any other applicable laws, the board shall:
* * *
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1062 ENROLLED
(3) Prescribe and select for use Authorize the superintendent to select free
textbooks and other instructional materials of instruction for children students
enrolled in the schools and programs under its jurisdiction. jurisdiction, based on
state Department of Education guidelines.
* * *
(5) Select a superintendent who shall be the chief administrative officer of
the district and who shall administer the rules, regulations, and policies adopted by
the board. The board shall delegate to the superintendent such of its powers and
duties as it deems appropriate to aid the superintendent in the efficient administration
of his responsibility for the implementation of the policies of the board. The board
shall provide for an annual evaluation for the superintendent. The superintendent
superintendent, or his designee, shall be responsible for all of the administrative
functions, duties, and needs of the board, including but not limited to the following:
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 17:1945.1(D)(5) through (8) are hereby repealed in their entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.